South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3759.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 19, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-19-25.  (A) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or special act providing for the election of trustees of a school district, all elected members of the boards of trustees for school districts of this State must be elected in partisan elections held at the time provided by law. (B) Nominations for candidates for elected trustee offices to be voted on in a general or special election may be by political party primary, by political party convention, or by petition. (1) For the trustees of any school district to be voted on at the same time as the November general election of even-numbered years: (a) candidates seeking nomination by political party primary or political party convention must file a statement of intention of candidacy, party pledge, and any filing fees pursuant to Section 7-11-15, and candidates or nominees must be certified as provided in Sections 7-13-40 and 7-13-350, as appropriate; (b) candidates seeking nomination by petition must submit the petition in accordance with Section 7-13-351. (2) For the trustees of any school district required by special act to hold elections at some time other than the same time as the November general election of even-numbered years: (a) a primary must be conducted twelve weeks before the election; and (b) candidates seeking nomination by political party primary or political party convention must file a statement of intention of candidacy, party pledge, and any filing fees with the county board of voter registration and elections no later than the sixtieth day preceding the primary; (c) a party nominating by party primary or party convention must certify the nominee to the county board of voter registration and elections not later than twelve o'clock noon sixty days prior to the election; and (d) candidates seeking nomination by petition must submit the petition and all necessary signatures to the county board of voter registration and elections not later than seventy-five days prior to the election. (C) To the extent the provisions of this section and the local law provisions of a school district relating to the election of trustees conflict, the provisions of this section control and are intended to repeal, supersede, or annul any such inconsistent provisions of a special act or local law. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----